Vermont, session 2025-2026, H292.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 6602 is amended to read:
§ 6602. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
VT LEG #379377 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.292
2025 Page 2 of 5
(1) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Natural Resources or his or her
the Secretary’s duly authorized representative.
(2) “Solid waste” means any discarded garbage; refuse; septage; sludge
from a waste treatment plant, water supply plant, or pollution control facility;
and other discarded material, including solid, liquid, semi-solid semisolid, or
contained gaseous materials resulting from industrial, commercial, mining, or
agricultural operations and from community activities but does not include
animal manure and absorbent bedding used for soil enrichment; high carbon
bulking agents used in composting; or solid or dissolved materials in industrial
discharges that are point sources subject to permits under the Water Pollution
Control Act, chapter 47 of this title.
* * *
(50) “Biosolids” means septage or sewage sludge derived, in whole or in
part, from domestic wastes that have been subjected to a treatment process for
the reduction of pathogens and have been demonstrated to meet the applicable
requirements in Agency rules for contaminant concentrations, vector attraction
reduction, and pathogen reduction.
(51) “Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances” or “PFAS” means
a class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least one fully
fluorinated carbon atom.
VT LEG #379377 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.292
2025 Page 3 of 5
(52) “Septage” means the liquid and solid materials pumped from a
septic tank, portable toilet, or cesspool during cleaning.
(53) “Sludge” means any solid, semisolid, or liquid generated from a
municipal, commercial, or industrial wastewater treatment plant or process,
water supply treatment plant, air pollution control facility, or any other such
waste having similar characteristics and effects. “Sludge” includes Class A
and Class B sewage sludge as those terms are defined under 40 C.F.R.
Part 503.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 6604b is amended to read:
§ 6604b. TESTING OF SOLID WASTES PRIOR TO BENEFICIAL USE
ON LAND OR DISTRIBUTION AND MARKETING
(a) The Secretary of Natural Resources, in consultation with the Secretary
of Agriculture, Food and Markets and with the Commissioner of Health, shall
adopt rules to establish a testing program for all biosolids, sewage sludge, or
similar liquid wastes, prior to their beneficial use on land or prior to
distribution and marketing of those wastes in liquid or solid form. The testing
program shall establish a process for the determination of minimum testing
frequencies and specific parameters for which analysis must be completed and
shall detail procedures by which samples are collected, stored, and tested.
(b) In establishing the process for the determination of test parameters and
frequency, the rules shall take into account the size and complexity of the
VT LEG #379377 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.292
2025 Page 4 of 5
facility,; the nature of the service area or collection system, including industrial
contributions,; the frequency of sewage sludge use on the land,; and any
existing data that is pertinent to the facility.
(c) Rules regarding the application of waste to fields shall take into
consideration the characteristics of the specific waste involved and shall
calculate the heavy metal or micronutrient soil holding capacity based on a pH
of 5.5 for the soil type at the application site, as appropriate.
(d) A person subject to this section shall make all analytical results derived
from the testing program provided for in this section available to the public
upon request.
(e) The Secretary shall test all biosolids, sewage sludge, or similar liquid
wastes for the presence of PFAS prior to land application of biosolids, sewage
sludge, or similar liquid wastes or prior to sale of biosolids.
(f) If PFAS are identified in biosolids, sewage sludge, or similar liquid
wastes under the testing required by subsection (e) of this section, a person
shall not:
(1) land apply the biosolids, sewage sludge, or similar liquid wastes; and
(2) sell the biosolids or products containing the biosolids.
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 6621a is amended to read:
§ 6621a. LANDFILL DISPOSAL REQUIREMENTS
VT LEG #379377 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.292
2025 Page 5 of 5
(a) In accordance with the following schedule, no person shall knowingly
dispose of the following materials in solid waste or in landfills:
* * *
(13) Solid waste, landfill leachate, septage, or sludge that has PFAS
levels exceeding the State standards for hazardous waste.
(b) This section shall not prohibit the designation and use of separate areas
at landfills for the storage or processing, or both, of material specified in this
section.
(c) Insofar as it applies to the operator of a solid waste management
facility, the Secretary may suspend the application of this section to material
specified in subdivision (a)(2), (3), (4), (5), or (6) of this section, or any
combination of these, upon finding that insufficient markets exist and adequate
uses are not reasonably available to serve as an alternative to disposal.
(d) The landfill disposal ban under subdivisions (a)(9)–(11) of this section
shall not apply to mandated recyclables, leaf and yard residuals, or food
residuals collected as part of a litter collection event operated or administered
by a nonprofit organization or municipality.
(e) Sludge shall not be used as daily cover at a landfill operating in the
State.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379377 v.1